Washington statutes.
RCW 7.25.005

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the meanings indicated unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) "Government entity" means the state of Washington, the state finance committee, any county, city, school district, other municipal corporation, taxing district, or any agency, instrumentality, or public corporation thereof.

(2) "Bonds" means one or more bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness.

(3) "Interested parties" means all taxpayers, ratepayers, or any other persons who have any obligations, rights, or other interests in the bonds or issuance thereof, or the project or purpose for which the bonds were issued or are to be issued.

[ 1999 c 284 s 2.]